Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 10

Tennessee Passenger Transportation Services Act

7-51-1001. Short title.

This part shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Passenger Transportation Services Act.”

Acts 1985, ch. 380, § 1.

Cross-References. Transportation systems, title 7, ch. 56.

7-51-1002. Governmental entity — Defined.

As used in this part, “governmental entity” means any political subdivision of the state of Tennessee and any municipality, metropolitan government, county or airport authority.

Acts 1985, ch. 380, § 2.

7-51-1003. Scope of authority.

Every municipality, or other governmental entity, is hereby expressly authorized and empowered to protect the public health, safety, and welfare by licensing, controlling, and regulating by ordinance or resolution each private passenger-for-hire vehicle providing transportation services operated within the jurisdiction of the municipality or other governmental entity.

Every municipality or other governmental entity is empowered to regulate the following:

Entry into the business of providing passenger transportation service, including taxicab service, within the jurisdiction of that municipality or governmental entity;

The rates charged for the provision of such passenger transportation service;

The establishment of safety and insurance requirements even if they reduce the number of such private passenger vehicles for hire that otherwise would operate within the jurisdiction of the municipality or other governmental entity;

The establishment of stands to be employed by one (1) or a limited number of firms providing passenger transportation;

Limited or exclusive access by such passenger transportation service, including taxicab service, to airports or other facilities operated by or within the jurisdiction of the municipality or other governmental entity;

The drivers of private passenger vehicles for hire;

The routes and stops of fixed route private passenger vehicles for hire; and

Any other requirement adopted to ensure safe and reliable passenger transportation service.

Acts 1985, ch. 380, § 3.

7-51-1004. Action on behalf of state — Immunity.

Any municipality or other governmental entity is authorized to carry out this part as acts of government on behalf of the state as sovereign, to the extent the governmental entity deems necessary or appropriate, even if it is anticompetitive in effect.

All immunity of the state of Tennessee from liability under state and federal antitrust law is hereby extended to any municipality or other governmental entity within the scope of authority contained in this part, and, when so doing, a municipality or other governmental entity shall be presumed to be acting in furtherance of state policy.

Acts 1985, ch. 380, § 4.

7-51-1005. Authority of department of safety unaffected.

Except as provided in § 7-51-1007(c), this part shall not apply to any motor vehicles operating passenger services that are subject to the authority of the department of safety pursuant to title 65, chapter 15.

Except as provided in § 7-51-1007(c), nothing in this part shall be construed as limiting or in any way interfering with the jurisdiction of the department of safety to regulate passenger operations in accordance with title 65, chapter 15.

Acts 1985, ch. 380, § 5; 1995, ch. 305, § 79; 1999, ch. 262, §§ 2, 3.

7-51-1006. Exemption.

This part shall not apply to any governmental entity of a county having a population of not less than two hundred eighty-seven thousand seven hundred (287,700) nor more than two hundred eighty-seven thousand eight hundred (287,800), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1985, ch. 380, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 85-270, 1985 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (10/30/85).

7-51-1007. Regulation of entry into the business of providing passenger transportation service — Limousine, sedan, shuttle and taxicab service.

In addition to exercising all the authority granted by all other provisions of this part, every governmental entity in any county having a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, is empowered to regulate entry into the business of providing passenger transportation service, including, but not limited to, limousine, sedan, shuttle and taxicab service.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Limousine” means any motor vehicle except a taxicab or sedan designed or constructed to accommodate and transport passengers for hire, with an extended wheel base and expanded seating capacity designed for the transport of persons. The vehicle will have additional rear seating capacity, area, and comforts; and shall be designed to transport not more than fourteen (14) in number, exclusive of the chauffeur/driver, and the principal operation of which is confined to the area within the corporate limits of cities and suburban territory adjacent to the cities;

“Sedan” means any motor vehicle, except a limousine or taxicab, designed or constructed to accommodate and transport passengers for hire, that does not have an extended wheel base or an expanded seating capacity designed for the transport of persons. The vehicle will have no additional rear seating capacity, area or comforts; shall be designed to transport not more than five (5) passengers, exclusive of the chauffeur/driver, and the principal operation of which is confined to the area within the corporate limits of cities and suburban territory adjacent to the cities, and not operated on a fixed route or schedule;

“Shuttle” means any motor vehicle designed or constructed to accommodate and transport passengers for hire, not more than fifteen (15) in number, exclusive of the driver, and the principal operation of which is confined to the area within the corporate limits of cities and suburban territory adjacent to the cities, and operated on a fixed route or schedule;

“Taxicab” means any motor vehicle except a limousine or sedan designed or constructed to accommodate and transport passengers for hire, not more than nine (9) in number, exclusive of the driver, and the principal operation of which is confined to the area within the corporate limits of cities and suburban territory adjacent to the cities, and not operated on a fixed route or schedule.

In any county to which this section applies, limousines, sedans, shuttles and taxicabs, as defined in this section, shall comply with the safety rules and regulations and the liability insurance requirements contained in title 65, chapter 15.

Acts 1999, ch. 262, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.